src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-a_33aes_sinnikas-dial_Jok.gen_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective -  - ei tsekattu : # Noun '' - ei tsekattu

     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Nom: sinnikäs
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Gen: sinnikkhään
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Par: sinnikästä
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Tra: sinnikkhääksi
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Abe: sinnikkhäättä
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Ine: sinnikkhäässä
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Ela: sinnikkhäästä
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Ill: sinnikkhäässeen
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Ade: sinnikkhäälä
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Abl: sinnikkhäältä
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+All: [sinnikkhääle, sinnikkhäälet]
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Ess: sinnikkhäänä

     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Nom: sinnikkhäät
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Gen: sinnikkhäitten
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Par: sinnikkhäitä
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Tra: sinnikkhäiksi
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Abe: sinnikkhäittä
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Ine: sinnikkhäissä
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Ela: sinnikkhäistä
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Ill: sinnikkhäissiin
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Ade: sinnikkhäilä
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Abl: sinnikkhäiltä
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+All: [sinnikkhäile, sinnikkhäilet]
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Com: sinnikkhäine
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Ess: sinnikkhäinä

     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Compar+Nom: sinnikkhäämpi
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Compar+Gen: sinnikkhäämän
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Compar+Par: sinnikkhäämpää
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Compar+Tra: sinnikkhäämäksi
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Compar+Abe: sinnikkhäämättä
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Compar+Ine: sinnikkhäämässä
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Compar+Ela: sinnikkhäämästä
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Compar+Ill: sinnikkhäämphään
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Compar+Ade: sinnikkhäämälä
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Compar+Abl: sinnikkhäämältä
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Compar+All: [sinnikkhäämäle, sinnikkhäämälet]
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Compar+Ess: sinnikkhäämpänä

     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Compar+Nom: sinnikkhäämät
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Compar+Gen: sinnikkhäämitten
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Compar+Par: sinnikkhäämpiä
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Compar+Tra: sinnikkhäämiksi
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Compar+Abe: sinnikkhäämittä
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Compar+Ine: sinnikkhäämissä
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Compar+Ela: sinnikkhäämistä
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Compar+Ill: sinnikkhäämphiin
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Compar+Ade: sinnikkhäämilä
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Compar+Abl: sinnikkhäämiltä
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Compar+All: [sinnikkhäämile, sinnikkhäämilet]
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Compar+Ess: sinnikkhäämpinä
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Compar+Com: sinnikkhäämpine

     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Superl+Nom: sinnikkhäin
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Superl+Gen: sinnikkhäimän
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Superl+Par: sinnikkhäintä
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Superl+Tra: sinnikkhäimäksi
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Superl+Abe: sinnikkhäimättä
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Superl+Ine: sinnikkhäimässä
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Superl+Ela: sinnikkhäimästä
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Superl+Ill: sinnikkhäimphään
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Superl+Ade: sinnikkhäimälä
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Superl+Abl: sinnikkhäimältä
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Superl+All: [sinnikkhäimäle, sinnikkhäimälet]
     sinnikäs+A+Sg+Superl+Ess: sinnikkhäimpänä

     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Superl+Nom: sinnikkhäimät
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Superl+Gen: sinnikkhäimitten
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Superl+Par: sinnikkhäimpiä
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Superl+Tra: sinnikkhäimiksi
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Superl+Abe: sinnikkhäimittä
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Superl+Ine: sinnikkhäimissä
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Superl+Ela: sinnikkhäimistä
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Superl+Ill: sinnikkhäimphiin
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Superl+Ade: sinnikkhäimilä
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Superl+Abl: sinnikkhäimiltä
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Superl+All: [sinnikkhäimile, sinnikkhäimilet]
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Superl+Ess: sinnikkhäimpinä
     sinnikäs+A+Pl+Superl+Com: sinnikkhäimpine
